Utah statutes.
10-8-1.5.   Authority to make benefits generally available to employees, their dependents, and an adult designee -- Registry authorized -- Limitations.

(1)  A municipality may, by ordinance enacted by the municipal legislative body, make benefits generally available to all municipal employees, their dependents, and an unmarried employee's financially dependent or interdependent adult designee.

(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), a municipality may, by ordinance enacted by the municipal legislative body, create a registry for adult relationships of financial dependence or interdependence.

(b)  A municipality may not create or maintain a registry or other means that defines, identifies, or recognizes and gives legal status or effect to a domestic partnership, civil union, or domestic cohabitation relationship other than marriage.

(3)  The municipality's recognition of an adult designee, the creation and maintenance of a registry under Subsection (2)(a), and any certificate issued to or other designation of a person on the municipality's registry are not and may not be treated the same as or substantially equivalent to marriage.

(4)  Neither an ordinance under Subsection (1) or (2)(a) nor a registry created under Subsection (2)(a) making an employee benefit available to an adult designee may create, modify, or affect a spousal, marital, or parental status, duty, or right.

(5)  An ordinance, executive order, rule, or regulation adopted or other action taken before, on, or after May 5, 2008 that is inconsistent with this section is void.

